Utah statutes.
34-38-3.   Testing for drugs or alcohol.

(1)  If an employer tests an employee or prospective employee for the presence of drugs or alcohol as a condition of hiring or continued employment, the employer is protected from liability as provided in this chapter if the employer complies with this chapter.  However, employers and management in general shall submit to the testing themselves on a periodic basis.

(2) (a)  An organization that operates a storage facility or transfer facility or that is engaged in the transportation of high-level nuclear waste or greater than class C radioactive waste within the exterior boundaries of the state shall establish a mandatory drug testing program regarding drugs and alcohol for prospective and existing employees as a condition of hiring any employee or the continued employment of any employee.  As a part of the program, employers and management in general shall submit to the testing themselves on a periodic basis.  The program shall implement testing standards and procedures established under Subsection (2)(b).

(b)  The executive director of the Department of Environmental Quality, in consultation with the Labor Commission under Section 34A-1-103, shall by rule establish standards for timing of testing and dosage for impairment for the drug and alcohol testing program under this Subsection (2).  The standards shall address the protection of the safety, health, and welfare of the public.



Amended by Chapter 284, 2010 General Session

